Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3 Local License Requirements

3-6-40.
Requirement by counties or municipalities of licenses for manufacture, distribution, or sale of wine; effect of revocation of license issued by commissioner or by county or municipality upon license issued by other.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the businesses of manufacturing, distributing, and selling wine at wholesale or retail shall not be conducted in any county or incorporated municipality of this state without a license from the governing authority of the county or municipality. A farm winery, as defined in Code Section 3-6-21.1, which is qualified and licensed by the state shall need no county or municipal license to manufacture wine or to distribute such wine at wholesale in accordance with this chapter if the farm winery has given to the municipal or county governing authority 60 days’ written notice of its intention to commence operations in the county or municipality and the county or municipal governing authority has not within said 60 day period adopted a resolution prohibiting the farm winery from commencing operations in the county or municipality without a local license.

When any county or municipal license issued pursuant to this Code section is revoked by the governing authority of such county or municipality, any similar wine license issued to the same person by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall automatically become invalid in the county or municipality in which the license was revoked.

When any state wine license issued pursuant to this chapter is revoked by the commissioner, any similar wine license issued to the same person by any county or municipality of this state shall automatically become invalid.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-811, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5301, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1142, § 2.